en: pyridoxine dipalmitate
bg: пиридоксин дипалмитат
cs: pyridoxin-dipalmitát
de: Pyridoxindipalmitat
el: διπαλμιτική πυριδοξίνη
es: dipalmitato de piridixona
et: püridoksiindipalmitaat
fi: pyridoksiinidipalmitaatti
fr: dipalmitate de pyridoxine
hu: piridoxin-dipalmitát
it: dipalmitato di piridossina
lt: piridoksino dipalmitatas
lv: piridoksīna dipalmitāts
mt: dipalmitat tal-piridossina
nl: pyridoxinedipalmitaat
pl: dwupalmitynian pirydoksyny
pt: dipalmitato de piridoxina
ro: dipalmitat de piridoxină
sk: pyridoxíndipalmitát
sl: piridoksin dipalmitat
sv: pyridoxindipalmitat

en: Folate
bg: Фолат
cs: Folát
de: Folat
es: Folato
et: Folaat
fi: Folaatti
hu: Folát
it: Folato
lt: Foliatai
lv: Folāts
mt: Folat
nl: Folaat
pl: Folian
pt: Folato
ro: Folat
sk: Folát
sl: Folat
sv: Folat

en: folic acid, pteroylmonoglutamic acid, Vitamin B9, B9, vitamin M
xx: vitamin B9, vitamin B₉, B₉ vitamin, B9 vitamin, B9, B₉, vitamin M, M vitamin, 3a316
ar: حمض الفوليك
be: Фоліевая кіслата
bg: Фолиева киселина, птероилмоноглутаминова киселина, Витамин B9
bn: ফলিক এসিড
bs: Folna kiselina
ca: àcid fòlic, vitamina B9, B9, vitamina M
cs: kyselina listová, kyselina pteroylmonoglutamová, vitamín B9
cy: Asid Ffolig
da: Folsyre, folinsyre
de: Folsäure, Pteroylmonoglutaminsäure, Vitamin B9
dv: ވިޓަމިން ބީ9
el: φολικό οξύ, πτεροϋλομονογλουταμικό οξύ, Βιταμίνη Β9
eo: foliata acido
es: ácido fólico, ácido pteroilmonoglutámico, Vitamina B9, vitamina M
et: foolhape, pteroüülmonoglutaamhape
eu: Azido foliko
fa: اسید فولیک
fi: foolihappo, pteroyylimonoglutamiinihappo, B9-vitamiini, B9, M-vitamiini
fr: acide folique, acide ptéroylmonoglutamique, Vitamine B9
ga: Aigéad fólach
gd: Searbhag dhuilleagach
gl: Ácido fólico
he: חומצה פולית
hi: फोलिक एसिड
hr: folna kiselina, pteroilmonoglutaminska kiselina, pteroylmonoglutamic, vitamin B9, B9
hu: folsav, pteroil-monoglutaminsav, B9-vitamin
hy: Վիտամին B9
id: Asam folat
is: Fólínsýra
it: acido folico, acido pteroil-monoglutammico, Vitamina B9
ja: 葉酸, ビタミンB9, ビタミンＢ９, ビタミン B9, ビタミン Ｂ９, V.B9, Ｖ．Ｂ９, V.B₉, V-B9, ＶーＢ９, V-B₉
kk: Птероилглютамин
ko: 엽산
ky: Фоли кычкылы
lb: Folsaier
lt: folio rūgštis, pteroilmonoglutamo rūgštis
lv: Folijskābe, pteroilmonoglutamīnskābe
mk: Фолна киселина
ml: ഫോളിക് ആസിഡ്
ms: Asid folik
mt: aċidu foliku, aċidu pterojlmonoglutamiku
nb: Folsyre
nl: foliumzuur, pteroylmonoglutaminezuur, Vitamine B9, B9/M
nn: folsyre, vitamin B9
oc: Vitamina B9
or: ଫୋଲିକ ଏସିଡ
pl: kwas foliowy, kwas pteroilomonoglutaminowy, Witamina B9, B9/M
pt: ácido fólico, ácido pteroilmonoglutâmico, Vitamina B9, B9/M
ro: acid folic, acid pteroilmonoglutamic, Vitamina B9
ru: фолиевая кислота, Витамин B9, b9
sh: Vitamin B9
sk: kyselina listová, kyselina pteroylmonoglutámová
sl: folna kislina, pteroilmonoglutaminska kislina
sq: Acidi folik
sr: фолна киселина
sv: folsyra, pteroylmonoglutaminsyra
ta: இலைக்காடி
te: ఫోలిక్ ఆమ్లం
th: กรดโฟลิก
tr: Folik asit
uk: Фолієва кислота
ur: فولک تیزاب
vi: axit folic
zh: 维生素B9, 叶酸

en: calcium-L-methylfolate
bg: Калциев L-метилфолат
cs: L-metylfolát vápenatý
de: Calcium-L-methylfolat
el: L-μεθυλοφολικό ασβέστιο
es: L-metilfolato cálcico
et: kaltsium-L-metüülfolaat
fi: kalsium-L-metyylifolaatti
fr: L-méthylfolate de calcium
hu: kalcium-L-metil-folát
it: L-metilfolato di calcio
lt: kalcio-L-metilfoliatas
lv: kalcija-L-metilfolāts
mt: L-methylfolate tal-kalċju
nl: calcium-L-methylfolaat
pl: L-metylfolian wapnia
pt: L-metilfolato de cálcio
ro: L-metilfolat de calciu
sk: L- metylfolát vápenatý
sl: kalcijev-L-metilfolat
sv: kalcium-L-metylfolat

en: folacin
es: folacina
fr: Folacine
it: folacina
nl: folacin

en: vitamin B12, B12, cobalamin
xx: vitamin B12, vitamin B₁₂, B₁₂ vitamin, B12 vitamin, B12, B₁₂
af: Vitamien B12
ar: فيتامين بي 12
az: B12 vitamini
bg: витамин В12, кобаламин
bn: সায়ানোকোবালেমিন
bs: Vitamin B12
ca: cobalamina, vitamina B12, B12
cs: kobalamin, vitamín B12
cy: cobalamin, Fitamin B12
da: Vitamin B12
de: Cobalamine, Vitamin B12, vitamine B12, B12, Methylcobalamin
dv: ވިޓަމިން ބީ12
el: Βιταμίνη B12
eo: Kobalamino, Vitamino B12
es: cobalamina, vitamina B12, B12
et: B12-vitamiin, Vitamiin B12
eu: Kobalamina, B12 bitamina
fa: ویتامین ب۱۲
fi: Kobalamiini, B12-vitamiini, Vitamiini B12
fr: Cobalamine, vitamine b12, b12
he: ויטמין B12
hi: विटामिन बी१२
hr: Kobalamin, Vitamin B12, B12, cianokobalamin, cijano-kobalamin
hu: B12-vitamin, Kobalamin, B12
hy: Վիտամին B12
id: Vitamin B12
is: B12-vítamín
it: Cobalamina, vitamina B12
ja: コバラミン, ビタミンB12, ビタミンＢ１２, ビタミン B12, ビタミン Ｂ１２, V.B12, Ｖ．Ｂ１２, V.B₁₂, V-B12, ＶーＢ１２, V-B₁₂
jv: Vitamin b12
kk: Кобаламин
ko: 비타민 B12
ky: Витамин В12
lb: Cobalamin, Vitamin B12
lt: Kobalaminas, Vitaminas B12
lv: B12 vitamīns
mk: Кобаламин
mn: Витамин В12
ms: Vitamin B12
mt: Vitamina B12
nb: Kobalamin, Vitamin B12
ne: भिटामिन बी-१२
nl: Cobalamine, vitamine B12
nn: kobalamin, B12-vitamin, vitamin B12
oc: Cobalamina, Vitamina B12
pl: Kobalamina, witamina B12
pt: Cobalamina, vitamina B12
ro: Cobalamină, Vitamina B12
ru: витамин B12
rw: Vitamini B12
sh: Vitamin B12
sk: Kobalamín, Vitamín B12
sl: Vitamin B12
sr: kobalamin, vitamin B12
sv: vitamin B12, B12, kobalamin
ta: உயிர்ச்சத்து பி12
te: విటమిన్ బీ12
th: วิตามินบี12
tr: B12 vitamini, Vitamin B12
uk: Кобаламін
vi: Vitamin B12
zh: 维生素B12

en: cyanocobalamin, cyanocobalamine
bg: Цианокобаламин
cs: kyanokobalamin
de: Cyanocobalamin, Cyanocobalamine
el: κυανοκοβαλαμίνη
es: cianocobalamina
et: tsüanokobalamiin
fi: syanokobalamiini
fr: cyanocobalamine
hr: cijanokobalamin
hu: cianokobalamin
it: cianocobalamina
ja: シアノコバラミン
lt: cianokobalaminas
lv: ciānkobalamīns
mt: ċjanokobalamina
nb: Cyanocobalamin
nl: cyanocobalamine
oc: Cianocobalamina
pl: cyjanokobalamina
pt: cianocobalamine
ro: cianocobalamină
sk: kyanokobalamín
sl: cianokobalamin
sr: Цијанокобаламин, cijanokobalamin
sv: cyanokobalamin
tr: Siyanokobalamin

en: hydroxocobalamin
bg: Хидроксокобаламин
cs: hydroxokobalamin
el: υδροξοκοβαλαμίνη
es: hidroxocobalamina
et: hüdroksokobalamiin
fi: hydroksokobalamiini
fr: hydroxocobalamine
hu: hidroxokobalamin
it: idrossocobalamina
lt: hidroksokobalaminas
lv: hidroksokobalamīns
mt: idrossokobalamina
nl: hydroxocobalamine
pl: hydroksokobalamina
pt: hidroxocobalamine
ro: hidroxocobalamină
sk: hydroxokobalamín
sl: hidroksokobalamin
sv: hydroxykobalamin

en: biotin
xx: biotin, vitamin B7, vitamin B₇, B₇ vitamin, B7 vitamin, B7, B₇, vitamin H, H vitamin, 3a880
ar: بيوتين
be: біятын
bg: биотин
ca: biotina, vitamina B7, vitamina H
cs: biotin, vitamin B7, vitamin H
de: Biotin, Vitamin B7, Vitamin H
dv: ވިޓަމިން ބީ7
el: βιοτίνη
eo: biotino
es: biotina, vitamina B7, vitamina H
et: biotiin, B7-vitamiin, H-vitamiin
eu: biotina, B7 bitamina
fa: بیوتین
fi: biotiini, B7-vitamiini, H-vitamiini
fr: biotine, vitamine B7, vitamine H
ga: bitin
gl: biotina, vitamina B7
he: ביוטין
hi: बायोटिन
hr: biotin, biotine
hu: biotin, B7-vitamin, H-vitamin
hy: Վիտամին H
it: biotina, vitamina B7, vitamina H
ja: ビオチン, ビタミンB7, ビタミンH
kk: биотин
ko: 바이오틴, 비타민 B7, 비타민 H
ky: биотин
lt: biotinas, vitaminas B7, vitaminas H
lv: biotīns
mk: биотин
ml: ബയോട്ടിൻ
mt: bijotina
nl: biotine, vitamine B7, vitamine H
oc: biotina, vitamina B7, vitamina H
pl: biotyna, witamina B7, witamina H
pt: biotina, vitamina B7, vitamina H
ro: biotină, vitamina B7, vitamina H
ru: биотин, витамин B7, витамин H
sh: biotin, vitamin B7, vitamin H
sk: biotín, vitamín B7, vitamín H
sl: biotin, vitamin B7, vitamin H
sr: биотин, витамин Х, витамин Б7
sv: biotin, B7-vitamin, H-vitamin
ta: பயோட்டின், உயிர்ச்சத்து பி7
th: ไบโอติน, ตามินบี7
tr: biyotin, B7 vitamini, H vitamini
uk: біотин
zh: 生物素

en: D-biotin
xx: D-biotin
de: D-Biotin
es: D-biotina
fi: D-biotiini
hr: D-biotin
hu: D-biotin
it: D-biotina
nl: D-biotine

en: vitamin B8
xx: vitamin B8, B8 vitamin, B8, vitamin B₈, B₈ vitamin, B₈
bg: витамин b8, витамин Б8, инозитол
ca: vitamina B8
de: Vitamin B8
es: vitamina b8
fi: B8-vitamiini
fr: vitamine B8
hu: B8-vitamin
it: vitamina B8
ja: ビタミンＢ８, ビタミン B8, ビタミン Ｂ８, V.B8, Ｖ．Ｂ８, V.B₈, V-B8, ＶーＢ８, V-B₈
nl: vitamine B8
pl: witamina B8
pt: vitamina B8

en: pantothenic acid
xx: vitamin B5, B5 vitamin, B5, vitamin B₅, B₅ vitamin, B₅
ar: فيتامين بي5
bg: пантотенова киселина, витамин B5
ca: àcid pantotènic, vitamina B5
cs: kyselina pantothenová, vitamín B5
cy: asid pantothenig, fitamin B5
da: pantotensyre, pantothensyre
de: Pantothensäure, Pantothenat, Vitamin B5
dv: ވިޓަމިން ބީ5
el: παντοθενικό οξύ
eo: pantotena acido
es: ácido pantoténico, vitamina B5
et: pantoteenhape, vitamiin B5
eu: azido pantoteniko, B5 bitamina
fa: ویتامین ب۵
fi: pantoteenihappo, B5-vitamiini
fr: acide pantothénique, vitamine B5
ga: aigéad pantaitéineach
gl: ácido pantoténico, vitamina B5
he: ויטמין B5
hi: विटामिन बी५
hr: pantotenska kiselina
hu: pantoténsav, panoténsav, B5-vitamin
hy: Պանտոտենաթթու
id: asam pantotenat
it: acido pantotenico, vitamina B5
ja: パントテン酸, ビタミンB5, ビタミンＢ５, ビタミン B5, ビタミン Ｂ５, V.B5, Ｖ．Ｂ５, V.B₅, V-B5, ＶーＢ５, V-B₅
kk: пантотен қышқылы
ko: 판토텐산
ky: пантотен кычкылы
lb: pantothensaier
lt: pantoteno rūgštis
lv: pantotēn-skābe, pantotēnskābe, B5 vitamīns
mk: пантотенска киселина
ml: പാന്റോത്തിനിക് ആസിഡ്
mn: пантотений хүчил
ms: asid pantotenik
mt: aċidu pantoteniku
nb: pantotensyre
nl: pantoteenzuur, pantotheenzuur
oc: acid pantotenic, vitamina B5
pl: kwas pantotenowy, kwas pantotenomy, witamina B5
pt: ácido pantoténico, vitamina b5
ro: acid pantotenic, vitamina B5
ru: пантотеновая кислота, витамин B5
sk: kyselina pantoténová, vitamín B5
sl: pantonenska kislina
sr: пантотенска киселина, витамин Б5
sv: pantotensyra, pantotenat
ta: பான்டோதெனிக் அமிலம், உயிர்ச்சத்து பி5
th: กรดแพนโทเทนิก, วิตามินบี5
tr: pantotenik asit, vitamin B5
uk: пантотенова кислота, вітамін В5
ur: پینٹوتھینک تیزاب
vi: axit pantothenic
zh: 泛酸

en: calcium pantothenate
de: Calcium-Pantothenat
es: pantotenato de calcio
fi: kalsiumpantotenaatti, kalsium-d-pantotenaatti
fr: pantothénate de calcium
hr: kalcijev pantotenat
hu: kalcium-pantotenát
it: pantotenato di calcio
ja: パントテン酸カルシウム, パントテン酸Ca
nl: calcium pantothenaat
nn: kalsiumpantotenat

en: calcium D-pantothenate, D-pantothenate calcium
xx: 3a841
bg: D-пантотенат калций
cs: D-pantothenát vápenatý
de: Calcium-D-pantothenat
el: D-παντοθενικό ασβέστιο
es: D-pantotenato cálcico
et: kaltsium-D-pantotenaat
fi: D-pantotenaatti kalsium
fr: D-pantothénate de calcium, D- calcium pantothénate
hr: kalcijev D-pantotenat
hu: kalcium-D-pantotenát
it: D-pantotenato calcio
ja: D-パントテン酸カルシウム
lt: kalcio D-pantotenatas
lv: kalcija D-pantotenāts
mt: D-pantotenat kalċju
nl: calcium-D-pantothenaat
pl: D-pantotenian wapnia
pt: D-pantotenato de cálcio
ro: D-pantotenat de calciu
sk: D-pantotenát vápenatý
sl: kalcijev D-pantotenat
sv: kalcium-D-pantotenat

en: D-pantothenate sodium
bg: D-пантотенат натрий
cs: D-pantothenát sodný
de: Natrium-D-pantothenat
el: D-παντοθενικό νάτριο
es: D-pantotenato sódico
et: naatrium-D-pantotenaat
fi: D-pantotenaatti natrium
fr: D-pantothénate de sodium
hu: nátrium-D-pantotenát
it: D-pantotenato sodio
lt: natrio D-pantotenatas
lv: nātrija D-pantotenāts
mt: D-pantotenat sodju
nl: natrium-D-pantothenaat
pl: D-pantotenian sodu
pt: D-pantotenato de sódio
ro: D-pantotenat de sodiu
sk: D-pantotenát sodný
sl: natrijev D-pantotenat
sv: natrium-D-pantotenat

en: dexpanthenol, D-panthenol
bg: декспантенол
de: D-Panthenol, Dexpanthenol
el: δεξπανθενόλη
es: dexpantenol
et: dekspantenool
fi: dekspantenoli
fr: dexpanthénol
hu: dexpantenol
it: dexpantenolo
lt: dekspantenolis
lv: dekspantenols
mt: dexpantenolu
nl: dexpanthenol
pl: dekspantenol
pt: dexpantenol
ro: dexpantenol
sk: dexpantenol
sl: dekspantenol
sv: dexpantenol

en: vitamin A and D
ca: vitamines A i D, A i D
da: vitamin A og D
de: Vitamin A und D
es: vitaminas A y D, A y D
fi: A- ja D-vitamiini
fr: vitamines A et D, A et D
nl: vitamine A en D, A en D
sv: vitamin A och D, vitamin A och vitamin D

en: vitamin A and D2, vitamin A and D₂
fi: Vitamiini A- ja D2